src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
lõpuklass+N:lõpu%#kl˘asʲs TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõpukord+N:lõpu%#k˘orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpukuu+N:lõpu%#k˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpulejõudmine+N:lõpule%#j˘õudmine SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõpuleviidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõpule%#v˘iidus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpuminut+N:lõpu%#minut REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõpuosa+N:lõpu%#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõpupäev+N:lõpu%#p˘äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõpus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõpus SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõpusesed+N:lõpusene OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpusireen+N:lõpu%#sir˘een TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpusirge+N:lõpu%#s˘irge AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõpuspurt+N:lõpu%#sp˘urt TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõputegemine+N:lõpu%#tegemine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõputiiter+N:lõpu%#t˘iiter%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõputseremoonia+N:lõpu%#tserem˘oonia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõputunnistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõpu%#tunʲnistus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõputus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõputus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõpuvile+N:lõpu%#vile PERE  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõrin+N:lõrin MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@R.Part.One@lõss+N:@R.Part.One@l˘õsʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõtk+N:l˘õtk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõtvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õtvus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuahabe+N:lõua%#habe HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuajoon+N:lõua%#j˘oon%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõualuu+N:lõua%#l˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõualõksutamine+N:lõua%#lõksutamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuamees+N:lõua%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuaots+N:lõua%#˘ots%>%{pl.i%} KAEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuapoolik+N:lõua%#poolʲik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuapuu+N:lõua%#p˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuapära+N:lõua%#pära KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõuats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõuats REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuatäis+N:lõua%#t˘äiS1%{stemill%} VARS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõuend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõuend REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõug+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õuG1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 7 " ; 
lõugamine+N:l˘õugamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõugas+N:l˘õuK2a KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõugne+N:l˘õugne SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõuguti+N:lõuguti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõugutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõugutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõukoer+N:l˘õu%#k˘oer%>%{pl.i%} KAEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõuna+N:l˘õuna LÕUNA  "weight: 7 " ; 
lõunaaeg+N:l˘õuna%#˘aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunaedel+N:l˘õuna%#edel MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunakaar+N:l˘õuna%#k˘aar%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunakagu+N:l˘õuna%#kagu KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunalaud+N:l˘õuna%#l˘auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõunaline+N:l˘õunaline OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunamaa+N:l˘õuna%#m˘aa%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõunamaalane+N:l˘õuna%#m˘aalane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunanaaber+N:l˘õuna%#n˘aaber%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõunaosa+N:l˘õuna%#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõunapoolkera+N:l˘õuna%#p˘ool%#kera%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõunapäike+N:l˘õuna%#p˘äi PÄIKE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunarannik+N:l˘õuna%#ranʲnik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunasadam+N:l˘õuna%#sadam MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunaserv+N:l˘õuna%#s˘erv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunasöök+N:l˘õuna%#s˘öök TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
lõunatoit+N:l˘õuna%#t˘oit%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunatund+N:l˘õuna%#t˘unD1 TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõunatuul+N:l˘õuna%#t˘uul%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunauinak+N:l˘õuna%#uinak VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõunavaheaeg+N:l˘õuna%#vahe%#˘aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõust+N:l˘õust%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõvi+N:lõv NIMI  "weight: 8 " ; 
lõvi+N:lõvi KAVA  "weight: 8 " ; 
lõvikoobas+N:lõvi%#k˘ooP2a KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõvilakk+N:lõvi%#l˘akk%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõviosa+N:lõvi%#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA  "weight: 9 " ; 
lõõg+N:l˘õõG1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõõgastumine+N:lõõgastumine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõgastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõgastus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõm%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõmutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõmutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõp TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõpija+N:l˘õõpija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõpimine+N:l˘õõpimine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõpjutt+N:l˘õõp%#j˘utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõr+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõr TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõõritamine+N:lõõritamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõritus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõsk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõsK1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõts+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õõts%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
lõõtsatõmbaja+N:lõõtsa%#t˘õmbaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõtsbuss+N:l˘õõts%#b˘usʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõtskaamera+N:l˘õõts%#kaamera AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõtsmoonik+N:l˘õõts%#moonik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõtspill+N:l˘õõts%#p˘ilʲl TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõtspillimängija+N:l˘õõts%#pilʲli%#m˘ängija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lõõtsutamine+N:lõõtsutamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lödi+N:lödʲi KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
löga+N:löga KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lömastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lömastus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lömitaja+N:lömitaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lömitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lömitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lörts+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘örts TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lörtsutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lörtsutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@löss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ösʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööberdaja+N:lööberdaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lööberdis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lööberdis OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
löödu+N:l˘öödu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
löögijõud+N:löögi%#j˘õuD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
löögirusikas+N:löögi%#rusika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@löögitäpsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@löögi%#t˘äpsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@löögivalmidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@löögi%#v˘alʲmidus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööklaine+N:l˘öök%#l˘aine PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
lööklane+N:l˘ööklane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööklaul+N:l˘öök%#l˘aul%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lööklus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ööklus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööknumber+N:l˘öök%#n˘umber%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööksõna+N:l˘öök%#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööktöö+N:l˘öök%#t˘öö%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööktööline+N:l˘öök%#t˘ööline SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lööm+N:l˘ööm%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
löömamees+N:lööma%#me MEES  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@löömar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘öömar REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
löömavend+N:lööma%#v˘enD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
löömine+N:l˘öömine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lööv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ööv TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
lööve+N:l˘ööB2e PINGE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@löövus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘öövus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@lüdi+N:@P.Stem.Single@lüdʲi KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lühemus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühemus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lühend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühend REDEL  "weight: 8 " ; 
lühendamine+N:lühendamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
lühendis+N:lühendis OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lühendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühendus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lühidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühidus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
lühifilm+N:lühi%#f˘ilʲm TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
lühijutt+N:lühi%#j˘utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lühikursus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühi%#k˘ursus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lühilaine+N:lühi%#l˘aine PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lühimaajooks+N:lühi%#m˘aa%#j˘ooks%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
lühimaajooksja+N:lühi%#m˘aa%#j˘ooksja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lühinägelikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühi%#nˈägel˘ikkus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
lühinõupidamine+N:lühi%#n˘õu%#pidamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
